District of Columbia statutes.
38-2561.10

Certificate of Approval — Renewal.

(a)

Nonpublic schools and programs for special education students may have their Certificates of Approval renewed for a period not to exceed 3 years.

(b)

If a Certificate of Approval has not been renewed by the SEA on or before the renewal anniversary date, the Certificate of Approval shall expire and the LEA shall take immediate steps to determine an appropriate placement, in accordance with the IDEA, for any District of Columbia funded students who attended the nonpublic special education school or program with the expired Certificate of Approval.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-269, § 110, 54 DCR 841
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-195, § 202(i), 61 DCR 12419

History

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-195, in (b), substituted “LEA” for “DCPS Superintendent of Schools” and substituted “for any District of Columbia funded students” for “to any DCPS-funded students.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 110 of Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-667, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1134).

Emergency Legislation